Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Forest Harvesting

§§ 49-19-51 through 49-19-77.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 310, § 1, effective upon passage and approved March 9, 2017.

§49-19-51. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-11; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 2.]

§49-19-53. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-10; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 1.]

§49-19-55. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-12; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 3.]

§49-19-57. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-13; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 4.]

§49-19-59. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-14; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 5.]

§49-19-61. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-15; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 6.]

§49-19-63. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-16; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 7.]

§49-19-65. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-22; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 13.]

§49-19-67. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-17; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 8.]

§49-19-69. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-21; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 12.]

§49-19-71. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-18; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 9.]

§49-19-73. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-19; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 10; Laws, 1974, ch. 569 § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).]

§49-19-75. [Codes, 1942, § 6046-20; Laws, 1944, ch. 240, § 11.]

§49-19-77. [Codes, 1930, § 6168; 1942, § 6026; Laws, 1926, ch. 161.]